Vermont, session 2025-2026, H685.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 8 V.S.A. § 4095d is amended to read:
§ 4095d. CHEMOTHERAPY TREATMENT AND ORAL ANTICANCER
MEDICATIONS
(a) A health insurance plan shall provide coverage for medically necessary
growth cell stimulating factor injections taken as part of a prescribed
chemotherapy regimen.
(b)(1) A health insurance plan shall provide coverage for scalp cooling
systems used in connection with cancer chemotherapy treatment.
(2) As used in this subsection, “scalp cooling system” means any device
used to cool the human scalp to prevent or reduce hair loss during cancer
VT LEG #385696 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.685
2026 Page 2 of 2
chemotherapy treatment, provided that the device is designed and intended for
repeated use and is primarily and customarily used to serve a medical purpose.
(c) A health insurance plan shall provide coverage for prescribed, orally
administered anticancer medications used to kill or slow the growth of
cancerous cells that is not less favorable on a financial basis than intravenously
administered or injected anticancer medications covered under the covered
individual’s plan.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on January 1, 2027, and shall apply to all health
insurance plans issued on and after January 1, 2027, on such date as a health
insurer offers, issues, or renews the health insurance plan, but in no event later
than January 1, 2028.
VT LEG #385696 v.1